Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 6

Tennessee Court Reporter Act of 2009

20-9-601. Short title — Legislative findings and declarations.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Court Reporter Act of 2009.”

The general assembly finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to promote the skill, art and practice of court reporting in order to assure that court reporters possess the necessary skills and qualifications and that a board be established to prescribe the qualifications of court reporters and to issue licenses to persons who demonstrate their ability and fitness for the licenses. This part is intended to establish and maintain a standard of competency for individuals engaged in the practice of court reporting and for the protection of the public, in general, and for the litigants whose rights to personal freedom and property are affected by the competency of court reporters. The examination, licensing and supervision of the conduct and proficiency of court reporters are integrally related to the effective, impartial and prompt operation of the judicial system of the state.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-602. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the Tennessee board of court reporting;

“Court reporting” means the making of a verbatim record by means of manual shorthand, machine shorthand, closed microphone voice dictation silencer or by electronic recording of any testimony given under oath before or for submission to, any court, referee or court examiner, by any board, commission or other body or in any other proceeding where a verbatim record is required. The taking of a deposition is the making of a verbatim record. “Court reporting” does not include the following:

Tape recordings made by attorneys or their agents under § 20-9-104, or use of video equipment and recordings by attorneys or their agents representing parties in any court proceeding, administrative law proceeding, deposition or any other proceeding;

Use of tape recorders and video equipment and recordings by judges, court officers and employees, administrative agency officials and employees, and officials and employees of any board, commission or other body; and

Attorneys conducting discovery in compliance with Rules 28, 29 and 30 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. The written stipulation pursuant to Rule 29 shall state the licensure status, as prescribed by this part, of the person before whom the deposition is taken; and

“Licensed court reporter” or “LCR” means any person licensed pursuant to this part to practice court reporting. Licenses shall indicate the method or methods in which the applicant has successfully passed examination of the organization or organizations approved by the Tennessee board of court reporting.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-603. Licensure requirement — Court reporter not required at all proceedings — Exceptions.

No person, except as otherwise provided by law, shall practice or attempt to practice court reporting in this state or hold the person out as a court reporter unless the person is a licensed court reporter.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to require a court reporter at any court proceeding, administrative proceeding, deposition or any other proceeding. In the event a court reporter is retained for a proceeding, then the court reporter shall be licensed under this part.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a licensed court reporter is not required to be a notary public to record any court proceeding, administrative law proceeding, deposition or any other proceeding. A transcript taken and submitted by a licensed court reporter is not required to be notarized. A licensed court reporter is authorized to administer oaths and swear in witnesses.

This part shall not apply to court reporting services paid for by a federal agency or other instrumentality of the United States.

This part shall not apply to court reporting services provided pursuant to title 40.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, §§ 1, 2, 10.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment added (c)-(e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1123, § 13. June 29, 2010.

20-9-604. Creation of Tennessee board of court reporting.

There is created the Tennessee board of court reporting, which shall be attached to the department of commerce and insurance, division of regulatory boards, which is authorized to administer all the administrative functions and duties of the board, except those discretionary regulatory duties and powers vested by law in the board members.

The board shall be comprised of seven (7) members, as follows:

One (1) circuit or chancery court judge;

Two (2) attorneys licensed to practice in the state;

Two (2) freelance court reporters who practice machine shorthand;

One (1) court reporter who practices any method of court reporting; and

One (1) freelance court reporter who practices electronic court reporting, closed microphone voice dictation silencer reporting or manual shorthand reporting (pen).

All court reporter members shall be licensed pursuant to this part; provided, however, that the initial court reporters appointed shall not be required to be licensed pursuant to this part until July 1, 2010.

All members of the board shall be citizens of the United States and this state. The initial terms shall begin July 1, 2009, and all appointments shall be made by the governor prior to July 1 of each year for which appointments are to be made. The court reporter members may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested court reporter groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Court Reporters Association. The governor shall consult with such groups before making any appointments to the board.

The initial members shall serve the following terms as designated by the governor:

Three (3) members shall serve for two (2) years;

Two (2) members shall serve for three (3) years; and

Two (2) members shall serve for four (4) years.

Subsequent terms of office shall be for four (4) years. No member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. In the event of a vacancy, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. Each member shall serve until a successor is duly appointed and qualified.

At its first meeting each calendar year, the board shall elect a chair, vice chair and secretary from its membership. No member shall be elected to serve more than two (2) consecutive years in the same office.

After the initial appointments have been made, the board shall meet during July 2009, or as soon thereafter as practicable, for the purpose of organizing and transacting business. Thereafter, the board shall meet not less than twice annually and as frequently as deemed necessary by the chair or a majority of the members. The board shall meet at a time and place designated by the board. A quorum shall consist of four (4) members.

Board members shall receive travel expenses according to the rules promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, § 11; 2012, ch. 698, § 3; 2015, ch. 355, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee board of court reporting, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall take effect July 1, 2010; however, Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3 further provided that, for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2015, ch. 355, § 3 provided that all records of the Tennessee Board of Court Reporting in the possession of the Administrative Office of the Courts on July 1, 2015, shall be transferred to and remain in the custody of the Division of Regulatory Boards in the Department of Commerce and Insurance.

Acts 2015, ch. 355, § 4 provided The Tennessee Board of Court Reporting is directed to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Title 4, Chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “One (1) court reporter” for “One (1) official court reporter employed by the state” at the beginning of (b)(1)(D).

The 2012 amendment, in (c), substituted “this state” for “the state” in the first sentence, rewrote the third sentence which read: “In making court reporter appointments to the board, the governor shall receive, but shall not be bound by, recommendations from interested court reporter groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Court Reporters Association.”, and added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendment substituted “which shall be attached to the department of commerce and insurance, division of regulatory boards” for “which shall be attached to the administrative office of the courts” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1123, § 13. June 29, 2010.

Acts 2012, ch. 698, § 4. April 11, 2012.

Acts 2015, ch. 355, § 5. July 1, 2015.

20-9-605. Duties and responsibilities of the board.

The board shall have the duty and responsibility to:

Act on matters concerning competency licensure only and the process of granting, suspending, reinstating and revoking a license;

Establish and maintain requirements for the ethical behavior of court reporters, including, but not limited to, conflict of interest provisions, inappropriate relationships with a party or a party's attorney and failure to honor a contract or commitment to furnish transcripts;

Establish a procedure for the investigation of complaints against licensed court reporters;

Set a fee schedule for granting licenses and renewals of licenses;

Maintain a current registry of licensed court reporters and a current registry of temporarily licensed court reporters. Registries shall be matters of public record;

Maintain a complete record of all proceedings of the board;

Adopt continuing education requirements no later than October 1, 2010. Requirements shall be implemented no later than January 1, 2011;

Determine the content of and administer examinations to be given to applicants for licensure as licensed court reporters and issue numbered licenses to applicants found qualified;

Maintain records of its proceedings and a registry of all persons licensed by the board, which shall be a public record and open to inspection; and

In the event funds are available to the board from fees after expenses, study and, if feasible, establish the transcript reimbursement fund to assist indigent parties in obtaining transcripts.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, § 12.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment deleted “; provided, however, that official court reporters employed full-time by the state shall not be required to pay such a fee” from the end of (4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1123, § 13. June 29, 2010.

20-9-606. Complaints — Remedies.

All complaints shall be in writing, signed by the person making the complaint, and addressed to the chair of the board. All complaints shall contain the name and address of the person against whom the complaint is brought and a description of the conduct giving rise to the complaint. Complaints shall be submitted within ninety (90) days of the conduct complained about, and a copy shall be provided to the licensed court reporter within five (5) business days of receipt by the board. The copy shall be sent by certified mail or by such other means of delivery to ensure that the licensed court reporter charged in the complaint receives actual notice. After investigation of the charges, the board shall determine if a hearing is warranted, dismiss the complaint, or take other action the board deems appropriate. Any hearing deemed warranted shall be conducted in accordance with the contested cases provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The board may, when it deems appropriate, seek civil remedies at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any unauthorized practice or violation of this part.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-607. Rules and regulations.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement, administer and otherwise effectuate the purposes of this part. All rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations shall be published in the standards of professional practice and made available to all licensees.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-608. Fines for practicing court reporting without a license.

After January 1, 2011, any person who undertakes or attempts to undertake the practice of court reporting for remuneration without first having procured a license, who knowingly presents or files false information with the board for the purpose of obtaining a license or who violates this part shall be subject to a civil fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500). Each day's violation is a separate offense. A person who is not licensed may not bring or maintain an action to recover fees for court reporting services that the person performed in violation of this part.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, §§ 3, 7.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment, in the first sentence, substituted “After January 1, 2011” for “After January 1, 2010” at the beginning and substituted “five hundred dollars ($500)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1123, § 13. June 29, 2010.

20-9-609. Qualification for licensure — Use of court reporter’s license number not authorized unless transcript produced by licensee or under licensee’s supervision — Licensee suspension of revocation for violation.

To be licensed as a court reporter, an applicant shall submit proof of passage of the National Court Reporters Association registered professional reporter examination, the National Verbatim Reporters Association certified verbatim reporter examination, or the American Association of Electronic Reporters and Transcribers certified electronic court reporter examination. Applications for licensure shall be signed and sworn by the applicants and submitted on forms furnished by the board. All applicants who are found qualified to engage in the practice of court reporting pursuant to this part shall be issued a license as a licensed court reporter and an identifying number. The license shall be valid for two (2) years from the date of issuance. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a licensed court reporter shall not be required to be a notary public to administer oaths to witnesses in the performance of their professional duties as a court reporter.

No licensed court reporter may authorize the use of the court reporter's license number on any transcript not produced through the court reporter's personal effort or supervision, or both. Violation of this subsection (b) may be grounds for license suspension or revocation.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-610. Reciprocal agreements with other entities — Application for nonresident licenses — Fees for nonresident application.

The board shall enter into reciprocal agreements with any state, agency or other entity that licenses, certifies or registers court reporters, such as the National Court Reporters Association (NCRA), the National Verbatim Reporters Association (NVRA) or the American Association of Electronic Reporters and Transcribers (AAERT), if the board finds that the state, agency or other entity has substantially the same or more stringent requirements as the board.

The reciprocity agreement shall provide that the board shall license a person who is currently licensed, certified or registered in another state or by another agency or other entity if that state, agency or other entity agrees to license, certify or register any licensees licensed pursuant to this part.

Nonresident court reporters desiring to make a verbatim record of any testimony of a proceeding, the jurisdiction of which is within the courts of this state or where appeal to any court of this state is allowable by law, shall make application for a nonresident license. The applicant shall make application on the same forms as required of other applicants, shall pay a fee in an amount determined by the board and shall present proof that the applicant is a competent licensed court reporter in another state or certified by NCRA, NVRA or AAERT. The board shall issue a nonresident license upon the finding the applicant has met these requirements. The license shall be valid for a period not to exceed two (2) years from the date of issuance. A nonresident court reporter shall reapply for licensure every two (2) years. A licensure fee in an amount determined by the board shall be required.

The board shall establish fees appropriate for processing reciprocal licensing.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-611. Fees for licensure.

The fees for licensure pursuant to this part shall be established by the board and shall cover a two-year period from the date of issuance or renewal of the license. All licenses shall expire June 30 in the year of expiration and all renewals will be effective July 1; provided, however, an initial license not issued on July 1 shall be valid from the date of issuance until June 30 of the second year from the June 30 preceding the date of issuance. The board shall impose a prorated fee for any license that is for a period less than twenty-four (24) months. All moneys collected pursuant to this part shall be deposited into the board of court reporting fund. All expenses incurred by the board in implementing and administering this part shall be paid out of the fund; provided, that the expenses of the board shall not be in excess of the moneys in the fund. The board may charge and collect the following fees, which shall be deposited into the fund:

An application fee for a temporary or regular license;

An examination fee, if applicable;

A renewal fee for a temporary or regular license;

A reinstatement fee for any application for reinstatement of a temporary or regular license that has been revoked or suspended; and

A late renewal fee for the renewal of a license after the due date, which shall be payment of the renewal fee plus a penalty as set by the board for each month that elapses before payment is tendered; provided, however, that delinquency of more than six (6) months shall result in revocation of licensure.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, § 4.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment added the second and third sentences in the introductory paragraph.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1123, § 13. June 29, 2010.

20-9-612. License renewal — Continuing education — Notification of change of address.

Each person licensed pursuant to this part shall apply for renewal of the license pursuant to dates established by the board. A renewal fee in an amount determined by the board shall be paid for renewal of the license for a two-year period.

The board shall require specific continuing education as a condition for license renewal. In order to maintain licensure, all licensed court reporters and holders of a nonresident certificate will be required to obtain a minimum of two (2.0) continuing education credits over a two-year period in courses approved by the board or in compliance with the continuing education requirements of approved national or state associations. The two-year period will begin on July 1 of the year during which the reporter is initially licensed. No credits may be carried over to the following two-year term.

The board may provide for the late renewal of a license that has lapsed and may require the payment of a late fee or an examination, or both, prior to issuing a renewal license.

Licensees shall notify the board in writing of any change of address within thirty (30) days of the change.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-613. Applications for grandfathering licensure to practice as court reporter — Automatic granting of licensure.

Any person who is engaged in the practice of court reporting on or before January 1, 2010, and who:

Provides to the board an affidavit setting forth past education and work experience as a court reporter and:

An affidavit of a judge for whom the person has worked as an official court reporter;

Affidavits of three (3) licensed attorneys; or

Affidavits of two (2) licensed attorneys and one (1) court reporting firm owner, unrelated by blood or marriage to the person, and who have utilized the services of the court reporter or the affidavit of the court reporting firm owner may state that the applicant has engaged in the practice of court reporting, which attest to the court reporter's proficiency in court reporting;

Provides proof of passage of the National Court Reporters Association Registered Professional Reporter examination, the National Verbatim Reporters Association Certified Verbatim Reporter examination, or the American Association of Electronic Reporters and Transcribers Certified Electronic Court Reporter examination; or

Provides proof of a court reporter license issued by any state; provided, that the state has the same or more stringent requirements of this chapter;

and upon payment of a fee in an amount determined by the board, shall be licensed to practice as a court reporter.

Any member in good standing of the Tennessee Court Reporters Association who holds the certified court reporter examination designation on or before January 1, 2010, upon payment of the licensure fee in an amount determined by the board, shall be automatically granted a license pursuant to this part and thereby may practice as a court reporter.

Any member in good standing of the Tennessee Court Reporters Association who holds the certified court reporter designation on or before January 1, 2010, and does not apply for licensure within one (1) year of July 1, 2010, shall be required to pass the licensed court reporter examination and pay applicable licensure fees in order to become a licensed court reporter.

Any member in good standing of the Tennessee Court Reporters Association who holds the registered professional reporter designation, or higher, from the NCRA, NVRA or AAERT on or before January 1, 2010, upon payment of the licensure fee in an amount determined by the board, shall be automatically granted a license pursuant to this part and thereby may practice as a court reporter.

The deadline for receiving applications under subsections (a) and (b) shall be July 1, 2011.

On or before October 1, 2012, any person who provides satisfactory proof that such person graduated from a court reporting program in this state prior to January 1, 2012, shall be licensed to practice as a court reporter.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, §§ 5, 6; 2012, ch. 960, § 1.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “Any person who is engaged in the practice of court reporting on July 1, 2009, and who provides to the board an affidavit setting forth past education and work experience as a court reporter and an affidavit of a judge for whom the person has worked as an official court reporter or affidavits of three (3) licensed attorneys, unrelated by blood or marriage to the person, and who have utilized the services of the court reporter, which attest to the court reporter's proficiency in court reporting, upon payment of a fee in an amount determined by the board, shall be licensed to practice as a court reporter. The deadline for receiving applications for grandfathering shall be July 1, 2011.”; substituted “on or before January 1, 2010” for “on July 1, 2009” throughout (b); and added (c).

The 2012 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1123, § 13. June 29, 2010.

Acts 2012, ch. 960, § 2. May 10, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. 20-9-613 does not unconstitutionally exclude from grandfather court reporter licensure status individuals who are not members of the Tennessee Court Reporters Association (“TCRA”) and include individuals on the basis of their TCRA membership. The statute provides a mechanism for individuals who are not TCRA members to gain grandfather court reporter licensure status and has a rational basis to include TCRA membership among the qualifications making an individual eligible for grandfathering. OAG 10-38, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (3/25/10).

20-9-614. Temporary license upon proof of graduation from court reporting program.

Any person who provides to the board satisfactory proof of graduation from a court reporting program or its equivalent shall, upon application to the board on forms approved by the board and payment of a fee in an amount determined by the board, be issued a temporary license to practice as a court reporter. This temporary license shall expire sixty (60) days following the date upon which the next board-approved examination for licensure is given. No more than three (3) additional temporary licenses shall be issued to any applicant who fails to pass the scheduled examination for licensure.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-615. Inactive status.

The board shall establish an inactive status for persons who are not actively engaged in the practice of court reporting.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

20-9-616. Disposition and disbursement of moneys collected — Budget — Contracting for services.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all moneys collected pursuant to this part shall be deposited in the state treasury in a separate fund to be known as the Tennessee board of court reporting fund.

Disbursements from this fund shall be made solely for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred in the implementation and enforcement of this part.

No such expenses shall be payable from the general fund of the state; except for the initial expenses of the board prior to the collection of licensure fees sufficient to defray such expenses.

Any part of the Tennessee board of court reporting fund remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be carried forward until expended in accordance with this part.

The board shall budget annually, in advance, its expenditures for programs, services, allocated overhead or chargebacks and other normal operating expenses as determined by the board. These expenditures so established shall be budgeted at the beginning of the fiscal year by the board, not to exceed the fees to be received by the board, including the excesses accumulated in the fund of the board. The commissioner of finance and administration shall inform the board annually, in advance for budgeting purposes, of the allocation of all overhead or chargebacks to the board.

Subject to approval of the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration, the board may also contract for services to carry out this part.

Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 1; 2010, ch. 1123, § 8.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment added “; except for the initial expenses of the board prior to the collection of licensure fees sufficient to defray such expenses” to the end of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 450, § 3. July 1, 2010; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations and appointment of board members, the act shall take effect June 23, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1123, § 13. June 29, 2010.